Louisiana, session 2026, SB226.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1454(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1454. Rating standards and methods
A. Rates shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory. Risks
may be classified using any criteria except that no risk shall be classified on the basis
of race, gender, color, creed, or national origin.
* * *